src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_1E_VQKK !!= * @CODE@ câʹǩǩed:câ^1VOW{ʹØ}kk
! seek parallel in TÄTTAD
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL^PALK VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: käʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kätt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PAL^PALK%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL^PALK%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Strong-StableV-Palatalization
:^V2VV^PAL^PALK VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: kääʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Strong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^PALK VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kaaʹttež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^V2VV VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: käättas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: sollõttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kättaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: käʹđ»
:^PAL^CC2CAllegro^PALK%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg:^PAL%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ largo

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL^PALK%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: solõʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: solõõtt-

LEXICON V_1E_VQCC_ERRORTH !! tag errors outside of XML
+Err/Orth: V_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON V_1E_VQCC !!= * @CODE@ käʹtted:kätt
: V0_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON IV_1E_VQCC !!= * @CODE@ käʹtted:kätt
+IV: V0_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON TV_1E_VQCC !!= * @CODE@ käʹtted:kätt
+TV: V0_1E_VQCC ;
LEXICON V0_1E_VQCC !!= * @CODE@ käʹtted:kätt
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V1C2_E
! seek parallel in TÄTTAD
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: käʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kätt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: käʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Strong-StableV-Palatalization
:^V2VV^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: kääʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Strong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kaaʹttež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^V2VV VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: käättas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: sollõttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kättaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: käʹđ»
:^PAL^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/SpellNoSugg:^PAL%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ; !!= * @CODE@ largo

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: solõʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: solõõtt-


LEXICON V_JOAQTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåå{ʹØ}tt
: V0_JOAQTTED ;
LEXICON IV_JOAQTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåå{ʹØ}tt
+IV: V0_JOAQTTED ;
LEXICON TV_JOAQTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåå{ʹØ}tt
+TV: V0_JOAQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_JOAQTTED !!= * @CODE@ jååʹtted:jåå{ʹØ}tt
!!! inflection_type="1"
!!! V2C2_E
! FORMS
!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: jååʹtted
+Err/Orth-no-q: VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: jååtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jåått
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jåʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: joʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:^PAL^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg4: jååʹđet
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL^CC2C VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: jooʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: jååđas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: jottu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: jåttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: jåʹđ»
:^VV2V^PAL^CC2CAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: jooʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^VOWRaise^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: joođ-

LEXICON V_KHEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
: V0_KHEQTTED ;
!LEXICON IV_KHEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
!+IV: V0_KHEQTTED ;
!LEXICON TV_KHEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
!+TV: V0_KHEQTTED ;
LEXICON V0_KHEQTTED !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹtted:ǩeâtt
!!! inflection_type="1"
! seek parallel in TÄTTAD
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^VV2V^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: ǩeʹtted
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ǩeâtt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ǩeʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization CHECKME = 2015-10-11
:^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ǩiʹtte
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Strong-StableV-Palatalization
:^PALE^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) +V+Imprt+Sg2: ǩeeʹtt
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Strong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PALI^PAL VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kiiʹttež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ǩeâttas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

:^VV2V^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: ǩittu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: keâttaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: keʹt»
:^VV2V^PAL^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED  ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: ǩiʹtti

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: ǩiitt


!LEXICON V_KOAQCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
!: V0_KOAQCCED ;
LEXICON IV_KOAQCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
+IV: V0_KOAQCCED ;
!LEXICON TV_KOAQCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
!+TV: V0_KOAQCCED ;
LEXICON V0_KOAQCCED !!= * @CODE@ kååʹcced:kååcc
!!! inflection_type="1"
! FORMS
!! Strong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: kååʹcced
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kååcc
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^VV2V^PAL%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kåʹcce
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: koʹcce
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:^PAL^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) 
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL^KK2GG VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kooʹʒʒež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^KK2GG VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: kååʒʒas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: koccu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kåccaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

! (10) Allegro for incoative: kåʹʒ»
:^VV2V^PAL^KK2GAllegro FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Act+PrsPrc: kooʹcci

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^VOWRaise^KK2GG VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: kooʒʒ-

LEXICON V_1E_VQYKK !!= * @CODE@ ceʹpcced:cẹpcc
: V0_1E_VQYKK ;
LEXICON V0_1E_VQYKK !!= * @CODE@ ceʹpcced:cẹpcc
! Associate with särnnad parallel
! FORMS
!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
:^PAL^PALK VSUF-INF_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) +V+Inf: ceʹpcced
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cepcc
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc, NomAct in MOsh

!! ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:^PAL^PALK%>e K ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ceʹpcce
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^VOWRaise^PAL^PALK%> VSUF-IND-PRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ciʹpcce
!! +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX^PALK VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) ceeʹpc-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX^PALK%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: ciiʹpcež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LowVowel-No-palatalization
:^V2VV^YXX2YX VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: ceepcas
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: cipccu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IMPRT_PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: cepssaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! (10) Allegro for incoative: ceʹps»
:^PAL^YXX2YX^PALK FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

!! (11) Present Participle:
:^VOWRaise^PAL^PALK FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: ciʹpcci

!! (12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
:^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX VSUF-CHED_ED ; !!= * @CODE@  (12) +Der+Der/ched: ciipc-
